Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF1002.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. NEW SECTION . 100B.51 Length of service award programs ââ authorization. The governing body of a municipality, as defined in section 100B.21, is authorized to establish a length of service award program for volunteer fire fighters as defined in section 85.61, emergency medical care providers as defined in section 147A.1 who are volunteers, and reserve peace officers as defined in section 80D.1A. The program shall provide length of service awards, as described in section 457(e)(11) of the Internal Revenue Code, to volunteer fire fighters, volunteer emergency medical care providers, and reserve peace officers serving a municipality that elects to establish a program. The program shall be designed to treat awards from the program as a tax-deferred benefit under the Internal Revenue Code. The governing body of the municipality shall, in consultation with the chief or other person in command of the fire department and police department serving the municipality, as applicable, adopt guidelines providing for eligibility requirements for participation by volunteer fire fighters, volunteer emergency medical care providers, and reserve peace officers, minimum vesting requirements, distribution requirements, and such other House File 1002, p. 2 guidelines as deemed necessary to operate the program. For purposes of this section, âvolunteerâ means the individual was compensated by the municipality for the individual's services for less than five thousand dollars per year in the immediately preceding calendar year and in the current calendar year. Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 100B.52 Length of service award program grant fund ââ appropriation. 1. A length of service award program grant fund is created in the state treasury under the control of the economic development authority. The fund shall consist of all moneys appropriated to the fund. 2. Moneys in the length of service award program grant fund are appropriated to the economic development authority for the purpose of providing grants to municipalities that have established a length of service award program as described in section 100B.51 to provide contributions to the program on behalf of participants in the program. The economic development authority shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A establishing a grant application process. The rules must require a municipality to electronically file the grant application with the economic development authority. The process shall provide for an application period beginning August 1 and ending September 30 of each year for a municipality that has established a length of service award program for volunteer fire fighters, volunteer emergency medical care providers, or reserve peace officers of a department with an annual budget under one hundred thousand dollars. For such municipalities, the process shall provide for a match of three dollars for each dollar contributed by the municipality, in an amount not to exceed five hundred dollars per person in the program receiving the grant. For all other municipalities, the process shall provide for an application period beginning September 1 and ending September 30 of each year, and for up to a dollar-for-dollar funding match in an amount not to exceed five hundred dollars per person in the program receiving the grant. If the amount in the fund is insufficient to pay all the eligible grants in a fiscal year, the director of the economic development authority shall prorate the moneys awarded to each municipality. The grant House File 1002, p. 3 process shall allow a municipality to use moneys received to fund the program from gifts, devises, bequests, or any other source for purposes of providing the funding match required by this subsection. 3. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2, interest or earnings on moneys deposited in the fund shall be credited to the fund. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys credited to the fund shall not revert at the close of a fiscal year. Sec. 3. APPROPRIATION. 1. There is appropriated from the sports wagering receipts fund created in section 8.57I to the economic development authority for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: For deposit in the length of service award program grant fund created in section 100B.52, as enacted by this Act: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,500,000 2. Moneys received from the sports wagering receipts fund pursuant to this section are not subject to the reporting requirements provided in section 8.57I, subsections 4 and 5. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 1002, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor